California statutes. Commercial Code
(5) After the expiration of the time given in the notification, an advertisement of the sale must be published once a week for two weeks consecutively in a newspaper of general circulation where the sale is to be held. The advertisement must include a description of the goods, the name of the person on whose account the goods are being held, and the time and place of the sale. The sale must take place at least 15 days after the first publication. If there is no newspaper of general circulation where the sale is to be held, the advertisement must be posted at least 10 days before the sale in not fewer than six conspicuous places in the neighborhood of the
 proposed sale.

(c) Before any sale pursuant to this section, any person claiming a right in the goods may pay the amount necessary to satisfy the lien and the reasonable expenses incurred in complying with this section. In that event, the goods may not be sold but must be retained by the warehouse subject to the terms of the receipt and this division.

(d) A warehouse may buy at any public sale held pursuant to this section.

(e) A purchaser in good faith of goods sold to enforce a warehouse’s lien takes the goods free of any rights of persons against which the lien was valid, despite the warehouse’s noncompliance with this section.

(f) A warehouse may satisfy its lien from the proceeds of any sale pursuant to this section but shall hold the balance, if any, for delivery on demand to any person to which the warehouse would have been bound to deliver the goods.

(g) The
 rights provided by this section are in addition to all other rights allowed by law to a creditor against a debtor.

(h) If a lien is on goods stored by a merchant in the course of its business, the lien may be enforced in accordance with subdivision (a) or (b).

(i) A warehouse is liable for damages caused by failure to comply with the requirements for sale under this section and, in case of willful violation, is liable for conversion.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Bills of Lading: Special Provisions [7301. - 7309.]

7301.

(a) A consignee of a nonnegotiable bill of lading which has given value in good faith, or a holder to which a negotiable bill has been duly negotiated, relying upon the description of the goods in the bill or upon the date shown in the bill, may recover from the issuer damages caused by the misdating of the bill or the nonreceipt or misdescription of the goods, except to the extent that the bill indicates that the issuer does not know whether any part or all of the goods in fact were received or conform to the description, such as in a case in which the description is in terms of marks or labels or kind, quantity, or condition or the receipt or description is qualified by “contents or condition of contents of packages unknown,” “said to contain,” “shipper’s weight, load, and count,” or words of similar import, if that
 indication is true.

(b) If goods are loaded by the issuer of a bill of lading:

(1) the issuer shall count the packages of goods if shipped in packages and ascertain the kind and quantity if shipped in bulk; and

(2) words such as “shipper’s weight, load, and count,” or words of similar import indicating that the description was made by the shipper are ineffective except as to goods concealed in packages.

(c) If bulk goods are loaded by a shipper that makes available to the issuer of a bill of lading adequate facilities for weighing those goods, the issuer shall ascertain the kind and quantity within a reasonable time after receiving the shipper’s request in a record to do so. In that case, “shipper’s weight” or words of similar import are ineffective.

(d) The issuer of a bill of lading, by including in the bill the words “shipper’s weight, load, and count,” or words of
 similar import, may indicate that the goods were loaded by the shipper, and, if that statement is true, the issuer is not liable for damages caused by the improper loading. However, omission of such words does not imply liability for damages caused by improper loading.

(e) A shipper guarantees to an issuer the accuracy at the time of shipment of the description, marks, labels, number, kind, quantity, condition, and weight, as furnished by the shipper, and the shipper shall indemnify the issuer against damage caused by inaccuracies in those particulars. This right of indemnity does not limit the issuer’s responsibility or liability under the contract of carriage to any person other than the shipper.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7302.

(a) The issuer of a through bill of lading, or other document of title embodying an undertaking to be performed in part by a person acting as its agent or by a performing carrier, is liable to any person entitled to recover on the bill or other document for any breach by the other person or the performing carrier of its obligation under the bill or other document. However, to the extent that the bill or other document covers an undertaking to be performed overseas or in territory not contiguous to the continental United States or an undertaking including matters other than transportation, this liability for breach by the other person or the performing carrier may be varied by agreement of the parties.

(b) If goods covered by a through bill of lading or other document of title embodying an
 undertaking to be performed in part by a person other than the issuer are received by that person, the person is subject, with respect to its own performance while the goods are in its possession, to the obligation of the issuer. The person’s obligation is discharged by delivery of the goods to another person pursuant to the bill or other document and does not include liability for breach by any other person or by the issuer.

(c) The issuer of a through bill of lading or other document of title described in subdivision (a) is entitled to recover from the performing carrier, or other person in possession of the goods when the breach of the obligation under the bill or other document occurred:

(1) the amount it may be required to pay to any person entitled to recover on the bill or other document for the breach, as may be evidenced by any receipt, judgment, or transcript of judgment; and

(2) the amount of any expense reasonably
 incurred by the issuer in defending any action commenced by any person entitled to recover on the bill or other document for the breach.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7303.

(a) Unless the bill of lading otherwise provides, a carrier may deliver the goods to a person or destination other than that stated in the bill or may otherwise dispose of the goods, without liability for misdelivery, on instructions from:

(1) the holder of a negotiable bill;

(2) the consignor on a nonnegotiable bill, even if the consignee has given contrary instructions;

(3) the consignee on a nonnegotiable bill in the absence of contrary instructions from the consignor, if the goods have arrived at the billed destination or if the consignee is in possession of the tangible bill or in control of the electronic bill; or

(4) the consignee on a nonnegotiable bill, if the consignee is entitled as against the consignor
 to dispose of the goods.

(b) Unless instructions described in subdivision (a) are included in a negotiable bill of lading, a person to which the bill is duly negotiated may hold the bailee according to the original terms.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7304.

(a) Except as customary in international transportation, a tangible bill of lading may not be issued in a set of parts. The issuer is liable for damages caused by violation of this subdivision.

(b) If a tangible bill of lading is lawfully issued in a set of parts, each of which contains an identification code and is expressed to be valid only if the goods have not been delivered against any other part, the whole of the parts constitutes one bill.

(c) If a tangible negotiable bill of lading is lawfully issued in a set of parts and different parts are negotiated to different persons, the title of the holder to which the first due negotiation is made prevails as to both the document of title and the goods even if any later holder may have received the goods from the carrier
 in good faith and discharged the carrier’s obligation by surrendering its part.

(d) A person that negotiates or transfers a single part of a tangible bill of lading issued in a set is liable to holders of that part as if it were the whole set.

(e) The bailee shall deliver in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7401) against the first presented part of a tangible bill of lading lawfully issued in a set. Delivery in this manner discharges the bailee’s obligation on the whole bill.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7305.

(a) Instead of issuing a bill of lading to the consignor at the place of shipment, a carrier, at the request of the consignor, may procure the bill to be issued at destination or at any other place designated in the request.

(b) Upon request of any person entitled as against a carrier to control the goods while in transit and on surrender of possession or control of any outstanding bill of lading or other receipt covering the goods, the issuer, subject to Section 7105, may procure a substitute bill to be issued at any place designated in the request.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7306.

An unauthorized alteration or filling in of a blank in a bill of lading leaves the bill enforceable according to its original tenor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7307.

(a) A carrier has a lien on the goods covered by a bill of lading or on the proceeds thereof in its possession for charges after the date of the carrier’s receipt of the goods for storage or transportation, including demurrage and terminal charges, and for expenses necessary for preservation of the goods incident to their transportation or reasonably incurred in their sale pursuant to law. However, against a purchaser for value of a negotiable bill of lading, a carrier’s lien is limited to charges stated in the bill or the applicable tariffs or, if no charges are stated, a reasonable charge.

(b) A lien for charges and expenses under subdivision (a) on goods that the carrier was required by law to receive for transportation is effective against the consignor or any person entitled to the goods unless
 the carrier had notice that the consignor lacked authority to subject the goods to those charges and expenses. Any other lien under subdivision (a) is effective against the consignor and any person that permitted the bailor to have control or possession of the goods unless the carrier had notice that the bailor lacked authority.

(c) A carrier loses its lien on any goods that it voluntarily delivers or unjustifiably refuses to deliver.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7308.

(a) A carrier’s lien on goods may be enforced by public or private sale of the goods, in bulk or in packages, at any time or place and on any terms that are commercially reasonable, after notifying all persons known to claim an interest in the goods. The notification must include a statement of the amount due, the nature of the proposed sale, and the time and place of any public sale. The fact that a better price could have been obtained by a sale at a different time or in a method different from that selected by the carrier is not of itself sufficient to establish that the sale was not made in a commercially reasonable manner. The carrier sells goods in a commercially reasonable manner if the carrier sells the goods in the usual manner in any recognized market therefor, sells at the price current in that market at the time of
 the sale, or otherwise sells in conformity with commercially reasonable practices among dealers in the type of goods sold. A sale of more goods than apparently necessary to be offered to ensure satisfaction of the obligation is not commercially reasonable, except in cases covered by the preceding sentence.

(b) Before any sale pursuant to this section, any person claiming a right in the goods may pay the amount necessary to satisfy the lien and the reasonable expenses incurred in complying with this section. In that event, the goods may not be sold but must be retained by the carrier, subject to the terms of the bill of lading and this division.

(c) A carrier may buy at any public sale pursuant to this section.

(d) A purchaser in good faith of goods sold to enforce a carrier’s lien takes the goods free of any rights of persons against which the lien was valid, despite the carrier’s noncompliance with this section.

(e) A carrier may satisfy its lien from the proceeds of any sale pursuant to this section but shall hold the balance, if any, for delivery on demand to any person to which the carrier would have been bound to deliver the goods.

(f) The rights provided by this section are in addition to all other rights allowed by law to a creditor against a debtor.

(g) A carrier’s lien may be enforced pursuant to either subdivision (a) or the procedure set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 7210.

(h) A carrier is liable for damages caused by failure to comply with the requirements for sale under this section and, in case of willful violation, is liable for conversion.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7309.

(a) A carrier that issues a bill of lading, whether negotiable or nonnegotiable, shall exercise the degree of care in relation to the goods which a reasonably careful person would exercise under similar circumstances. This subdivision does not affect any statute, regulation, or rule of law that imposes liability upon a common carrier for damages not caused by its negligence.

(b) Damages may be limited by a term in the bill of lading or in a transportation agreement that the carrier’s liability may not exceed a value stated in the bill or transportation agreement if the carrier’s rates are dependent upon value and the consignor is afforded an opportunity to declare a higher value and the consignor is advised of the opportunity. However, such a limitation is not effective with respect to the carrier’s
 liability for conversion to its own use.

(c) Reasonable provisions as to the time and manner of presenting claims and commencing actions based on the shipment may be included in a bill of lading or a transportation agreement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Warehouse Receipts and Bills of Lading: General Obligations [7401. - 7404.]

7401.

The obligations imposed by this division on an issuer apply to a document of title even if:

(1) the document does not comply with the requirements of this division or of any other statute, rule, or regulation regarding its issuance, form, or content;

(2) the issuer violated laws regulating the conduct of its business;

(3) the goods covered by the document were owned by the bailee when the document was issued; or

(4) the person issuing the document is not a warehouse but the document purports to be a warehouse receipt.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7402.

A duplicate or any other document of title purporting to cover goods already represented by an outstanding document of the same issuer does not confer any right in the goods, except as provided in the case of tangible bills of lading in a set of parts, overissue of documents for fungible goods, substitutes for lost, stolen, or destroyed documents, or substitute documents issued pursuant to Section 7105. The issuer is liable for damages caused by its overissue or failure to identify a duplicate document by a conspicuous notation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7403.

(a) A bailee shall deliver the goods to a person entitled under a document of title if the person complies with subdivisions (b) and (c), unless and to the extent that the bailee establishes any of the following:

(1) delivery of the goods to a person whose receipt was rightful as against the claimant;

(2) damage to or delay, loss, or destruction of the goods for which the bailee is not liable;

(3) previous sale or other disposition of the goods in lawful enforcement of a lien or on a warehouse’s lawful termination of storage;

(4) the exercise by a seller of its right to stop delivery pursuant to Section 2705 or by a lessor of its right to stop delivery pursuant to Section 10526;

(5) a
 diversion, reconsignment, or other disposition pursuant to Section 7303;

(6) release, satisfaction, or any other personal defense against the claimant; or

(7) any other lawful excuse.

(b) A person claiming goods covered by a document of title shall satisfy the bailee’s lien if the bailee so requests or if the bailee is prohibited by law from delivering the goods until the charges are paid.

(c) Unless a person claiming the goods is a person against which the document of title does not confer a right under subdivision (a) of Section 7503:

(1) the person claiming under a document shall surrender possession or control of any outstanding negotiable document covering the goods for cancellation or indication of partial deliveries; and

(2) the bailee shall cancel the document or conspicuously indicate in the document the partial delivery or the bailee
 is liable to any person to which the document is duly negotiated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7404.

A bailee that in good faith has received goods and delivered or otherwise disposed of the goods according to the terms of a document of title or pursuant to this division is not liable for the goods even if:

(1) the person from which the bailee received the goods did not have authority to procure the document or to dispose of the goods; or

(2) the person to which the bailee delivered the goods did not have authority to receive the goods.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Warehouse Receipts and Bills of Lading: Negotiation and Transfer [7501. - 7509.]

7501.

(a) The following rules apply to a negotiable tangible document of title:

(1) If the document’s original terms run to the order of a named person, the document is negotiated by the named person’s indorsement and delivery. After the named person’s indorsement in blank or to bearer, any person may negotiate the document by delivery alone.

(2) If the document’s original terms run to bearer, it is negotiated by delivery alone.

(3) If the document’s original terms run to the order of a named person and it is delivered to the named person, the effect is the same as if the document had been negotiated.

(4) Negotiation of the document after it has been indorsed to a named person requires indorsement by the named person and
 delivery.

(5) A document is duly negotiated if it is negotiated in the manner stated in this subdivision to a holder that purchases it in good faith, without notice of any defense against or claim to it on the part of any person, and for value, unless it is established that the negotiation is not in the regular course of business or financing or involves receiving the document in settlement or payment of a monetary obligation.

(b) The following rules apply to a negotiable electronic document of title:

(1) If the document’s original terms run to the order of a named person or to bearer, the document is negotiated by delivery of the document to another person. Indorsement by the named person is not required to negotiate the document.

(2) If the document’s original terms run to the order of a named person and the named person has control of the document, the effect is the same as if the document had
 been negotiated.

(3) A document is duly negotiated if it is negotiated in the manner stated in this subdivision to a holder that purchases it in good faith, without notice of any defense against or claim to it on the part of any person, and for value, unless it is established that the negotiation is not in the regular course of business or financing or involves taking delivery of the document in settlement or payment of a monetary obligation.

(c) Indorsement of a nonnegotiable document of title neither makes it negotiable nor adds to the transferee’s rights.

(d) The naming in a negotiable bill of lading of a person to be notified of the arrival of the goods does not limit the negotiability of the bill or constitute notice to a purchaser of the bill of any interest of that person in the goods.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7502.

(a) Subject to Sections 7205 and 7503, a holder to which a negotiable document of title has been duly negotiated acquires thereby:

(1) title to the document;

(2) title to the goods;

(3) all rights accruing under the law of agency or estoppel, including rights to goods delivered to the bailee after the document was issued; and

(4) the direct obligation of the issuer to hold or deliver the goods according to the terms of the document free of any defense or claim by the issuer except those arising under the terms of the document or under this division, but in the case of a delivery order, the bailee’s obligation accrues only upon the bailee’s acceptance of the delivery order and the obligation acquired by the holder is
 that the issuer and any indorser will procure the acceptance of the bailee.

(b) Subject to Section 7503, title and rights acquired by due negotiation are not defeated by any stoppage of the goods represented by the document of title or by surrender of the goods by the bailee and are not impaired even if:

(1) the due negotiation or any prior due negotiation constituted a breach of duty;

(2) any person has been deprived of possession of a negotiable tangible document or control of a negotiable electronic document by misrepresentation, fraud, accident, mistake, duress, loss, theft, or conversion; or

(3) a previous sale or other transfer of the goods or document has been made to a third person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.

(a) A document of title confers no right in goods against a person that before issuance of the document had a legal interest or a perfected security interest in the goods and that did not:

(1) deliver or entrust the goods or any document of title covering the goods to the bailor or the bailor’s nominee with:

(A) actual or apparent authority to ship, store, or sell;

(B) power to obtain delivery under Section 7403; or

(C) power of disposition under Section 2403 or 9320 or subdivision (c) of Section 9321 or subdivision (b) of Section 10304 or subdivision (b) of Section 10305 or other statute or rule of law; or

(2) acquiesce in the procurement by the bailor or its nominee of any document.

(b) Title to goods based upon an unaccepted delivery order is subject to the rights of any person to which a negotiable warehouse receipt or bill of lading covering the goods has been duly negotiated. That title may be defeated under Section 7504 to the same extent as the rights of the issuer or a transferee from the issuer.

(c) Title to goods based upon a bill of lading issued to a freight forwarder is subject to the rights of any person to which a bill issued by the freight forwarder is duly negotiated. However, delivery by the carrier in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7401) pursuant to its own bill of lading discharges the carrier’s obligation to deliver.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7504.

(a) A transferee of a document of title, whether negotiable or nonnegotiable, to which the document has been delivered but not duly negotiated, acquires the title and rights that its transferor had or had actual authority to convey.

(b) In the case of a transfer of a nonnegotiable document of title, until but not after the bailee receives notice of the transfer, the rights of the transferee may be defeated:

(1) by those creditors of the transferor which could treat the transfer as void under Section 2402 or 10308;

(2) by a buyer from the transferor in ordinary course of business if the bailee has delivered the goods to the buyer or received notification of the buyer’s rights;

(3) by a lessee from the transferor in
 ordinary course of business if the bailee has delivered the goods to the lessee or received notification of the lessee’s rights; or

(4) as against the bailee, by good-faith dealings of the bailee with the transferor.

(c) A diversion or other change of shipping instructions by the consignor in a nonnegotiable bill of lading which causes the bailee not to deliver the goods to the consignee defeats the consignee’s title to the goods if the goods have been delivered to a buyer in ordinary course of business or a lessee in ordinary course of business and, in any event, defeats the consignee’s rights against the bailee.

(d) Delivery of the goods pursuant to a nonnegotiable document of title may be stopped by a seller under Section 2705 or a lessor under Section 10526, subject to the requirements of due notification in those sections. A bailee that honors the seller’s or lessor’s instructions is entitled to be indemnified by the
 seller or lessor against any resulting loss or expense.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7505.

The indorsement of a tangible document of title issued by a bailee does not make the indorser liable for any default by the bailee or previous endorsers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.

The transferee of a negotiable tangible document of title has a specifically enforceable right to have its transferor supply any necessary indorsement, but the transfer becomes a negotiation only as of the time the indorsement is supplied.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.

If a person negotiates or delivers a document of title for value, otherwise than as a mere intermediary under Section 7508, unless otherwise agreed, the transferor, in addition to any warranty made in selling or leasing the goods, warrants to its immediate purchaser only that:

(1) the document is genuine;

(2) the transferor does not have knowledge of any fact that would impair the document’s validity or worth; and

(3) the negotiation or delivery is rightful and fully effective with respect to the title to the document and the goods it represents.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7508.

A collecting bank or other intermediary known to be entrusted with documents of title on behalf of another or with collection of a draft or other claim against delivery of documents warrants by the delivery of the documents only its own good faith and authority even if the collecting bank or other intermediary has purchased or made advances against the claim or draft to be collected.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7509.

Whether a document of title is adequate to fulfill the obligations of a contract for sale, a contract for lease, or the conditions of a letter of credit is determined by Division 2 (commencing with Section 2101), Division 5 (commencing with Section 5101), or Division 10 (commencing with Section 10101).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Warehouse Receipts and Bills Of Lading: Miscellaneous Provisions [7601. - 7603.]

7601.

(a) If a document of title is lost, stolen, or destroyed, a court may order delivery of the goods or issuance of a substitute document and the bailee may without liability to any person comply with the order. If the document was negotiable, a court may not order delivery of the goods or issuance of a substitute document without the claimant’s posting security unless it finds that any person that may suffer loss as a result of nonsurrender of possession or control of the document is adequately protected against the loss. If the document was nonnegotiable, the court may require security. The court may also order payment of the bailee’s reasonable costs and attorney’s fees in any action under this subdivision.

(b) A bailee that, without a court order, delivers goods to a person claiming under a missing
 negotiable document of title is liable to any person injured thereby. If the delivery is not in good faith, the bailee is liable for conversion. Delivery in good faith is not conversion if the claimant posts security with the bailee in an amount at least double the value of the goods at the time of posting to indemnify any person injured by the delivery which files a notice of claim within one year after the delivery.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7602.

Unless a document of title was originally issued upon delivery of the goods by a person that did not have power to dispose of them, a lien does not attach by virtue of any judicial process to goods in the possession of a bailee for which a negotiable document of title is outstanding unless possession or control of the document is first surrendered to the bailee or the document’s negotiation is enjoined. The bailee may not be compelled to deliver the goods pursuant to process until possession or control of the document is surrendered to the bailee or to the court. A purchaser of the document for value without notice of the process or injunction takes free of the lien imposed by judicial process.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7603.

If more than one person claims title to or possession of the goods, the bailee is excused from delivery until the bailee has a reasonable time to ascertain the validity of the adverse claims or to commence an action for interpleader. The bailee may assert an interpleader either in defending an action for nondelivery of the goods or by original action.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8. INVESTMENT SECURITIES [8101. - 8603.]



CHAPTER 1. Short Title and General Matters [8101. - 8116.]

8101.

This division may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code—Investment Securities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8102.

(a) In this division:

(1) “Adverse claim” means a claim that a claimant has a property interest in a financial asset and that it is a violation of the rights of the claimant for another person to hold, transfer, or deal with the financial asset.

(2) “Bearer form,” as applied to a certificated security, means a form in which the security is payable to the bearer of the security certificate according to its terms but not by reason of an indorsement.

(3) “Broker” means a person defined as a broker or dealer under the federal
 securities laws, but without excluding a bank acting in that capacity.

(4) “Certificated security” means a security that is represented by a certificate.

(5) “Clearing corporation” means any of the following:

(A) A person that is registered as a “clearing agency” under the federal securities laws.

(B) A federal reserve bank.

(C) Any other person that provides clearance or settlement services with respect to financial assets that would require it to register as a clearing agency under the federal securities laws but for an exclusion or exemption from the registration requirement, if its activities
 as a clearing corporation, including promulgation of rules, are subject to regulation by a federal or state governmental authority.

(6) “Communicate” means to either:

(A) Send a signed record.

(B) Transmit information by any mechanism agreed upon by the persons transmitting and receiving the information.

(7) “Entitlement holder” means a person identified in the records of a securities intermediary as the person having a security entitlement against the securities intermediary. If a person acquires a security entitlement by virtue of paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8501, that person is the entitlement holder.

(8) “Entitlement order” means a notification communicated to a securities intermediary directing transfer or redemption of a financial asset to which the entitlement holder has a security entitlement.

(9) “Financial asset,” except as otherwise provided in Section 8103, means any of the following:

(A) A security.

(B) An obligation of a person or a share, participation, or other interest in a person or in property or an enterprise of a person, that is, or is of a type, dealt in or traded on financial markets, or that is recognized in any area in which it is issued or dealt in as a medium for investment.

(C) Any property that is held by a securities intermediary for another person in a securities account if the securities intermediary has expressly agreed with the other person that the property is to be treated as a financial asset under this division. As context requires, the term means either the interest itself or the means by which a person’s claim to it is evidenced, including a certificated or uncertificated security, a security certificate, or a security entitlement.

(10) [Reserved]

(11) “Endorsement” means a signature that alone or accompanied by other words is made on a security certificate in registered form or on a separate document for the purpose of assigning, transferring, or redeeming the security or granting a power to assign, transfer, or redeem
 it.

(12) “Instruction” means a notification communicated to the issuer of an uncertificated security that directs that the transfer of the security be registered or that the security be redeemed.

(13) “Registered form,” as applied to a certificated security, means a form in which both of the following apply:

(A) The security certificate specifies a person entitled to the security.

(B) A transfer of the security may be registered upon books maintained for that purpose by or on behalf of the issuer, or the security certificate so states.

(14) “Securities intermediary” means either:

(A) A clearing corporation.

(B) A person, including a bank or broker, that in the ordinary course of its business maintains securities accounts for others and is acting in that capacity.

(15) “Security,” except as otherwise provided in Section 8103, means an obligation of an issuer or a share, participation, or other interest in an issuer or in property or an enterprise of an issuer that is all of the following:

(A) It is represented by a security certificate in bearer or registered form, or the transfer of it may be registered upon books maintained for that purpose by or on behalf of the issuer.

(B) It is one of a class or series or by its terms is divisible into a class or series of shares, participations, interests, or obligations.

(C) It is either of the following:

(i) It is, or is of a type, dealt in or traded on securities exchanges or securities markets.

(ii) It is a medium for investment and by its terms expressly provides that it is a security governed by this division.

(16) “Security certificate” means a certificate representing a security.

(17) “Security entitlement” means the rights and property interest of an entitlement holder with respect to a financial asset specified
 in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8501).

(18) “Uncertificated security” means a security that is not represented by a certificate.

(b) The following definitions in this division and other divisions apply to this division:

Appropriate person. Section 8107.

Control. Section 8106.

Controllable account. Section 9102.

Controllable electronic record. Section 12102.

Controllable payment intangible. Section 9102.

Delivery. Section 8301.

Investment company security. Section 8103.

Issuer. Section 8201.

Overissue. Section 8210.

Protected purchaser. Section 8303.

Securities account. Section 8501.

(c) In addition, Division 1 (commencing with Section 1101) contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this division.

(d) The characterization of a person, business, or transaction for purposes of this division does not determine the characterization of the person, business, or transaction for purposes of any other law, regulation, or rule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 19.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8103.

(a) A share or similar equity interest issued by a corporation, business trust, joint stock company, or similar entity is a security.

(b) An “investment company security” is a security. “Investment company security” means a share or similar equity interest issued by an entity that is registered as an investment company under the federal investment company laws, an interest in a unit investment trust that is so registered, or a face-amount certificate issued by a face-amount certificate company that is so registered. Investment company security does not include an insurance policy or endowment policy or annuity contract issued by an insurance company.

(c) An interest in a partnership or limited liability company is not a security unless it is dealt in or traded on securities exchanges or in securities markets, its terms expressly provide that it is a security governed by this division, or it is an investment company security. However, an interest in a partnership or limited liability company is a financial asset if it is held in a securities account.
